Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.120

Receiving deposits when insolvent—Penalty.

An officer, director, or employee of any bank who shall fraudulently receive for it any deposit, knowing that such bank or trust company is insolvent, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2014 c 37 s 230; 2003 c 53 s 191; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.120. Prior: 1933 c 42 s 26; 1917 c 80 s 81; RRS s 3288. Formerly RCW 30.44.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Receiving deposits after insolvency prohibited: State Constitution Art. 12 s 12.